grammars/kunwok.foma
read lexc grammars/class.verb.lexc
define VerbLexicon; 

read lexc grammars/class.nouns.lexc
define NounLexicon;

read lexc grammars/class.adj.adv.lexc
define AdjAdvLexicon;

read lexc grammars/class.func.lexc
define FuncLexicon;

# Vowels
define V [ a | e | i | o | u ];

# Consonents
define C [ b | m | w | k | g | d | n | l | r | j | y | h ];
define bilabialStops ["b" | "bb"];
define bilabialNasals ["m"];
define bilabialSemivowel ["w"];
define velarStops ["k" | "kk" | "g"];
define velarNasal ["ng"];
define apicoStops ["d" | "dd" | "rd" | "rdd"];
define apicoNasals ["n" | "rn"];
define apicoLateral ["l" | "rl"];
define apicoRhotic ["rr" | "r"];
define palatalStops ["dj" | "djdj"];
define palatalNasals ["nj"];
define palatalSemivowels ["y"];
define glottalStop ["h"];
define flap ["d" | "rr"];

define PhoneticVariation flap -> flap .o.
                         apicoRhotic -> apicoRhotic .o.
                         apicoNasals -> apicoNasals .o.
                         apicoLateral -> apicoLateral .o.
                         apicoStops -> apicoStops .o. 
                         velarStops -> velarStops .o. 
                         palatalStops -> palatalStops .o.
                         bilabialStops -> bilabialStops;


# Flag Diacritics
define FLAGS [
    ("@R.TENSE.P@") | 
    ("@P.TENSE.P@") | 
    ("@R.TENSE.NP@") |
    ("@P.TENSE.NP@") |
    ("@P.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
    ("@R.VALENCE.TRNS@") |
    ("@P.VALENCE.INTR@") |
    ("@R.VALENCE.INTR@") ];

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

# Define regular vowel changes
define DeletePrecedingVowel V -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "~" .o.
                            "~" -> 0;

# Define regular vowel changes
define DeleteFollowingVowel V -> 0 || FLAGS * "^" "=" _ .o.
                            "=" -> 0 ;

# Directional phonological changes
define DirPhonChanges "(ku)" -> 0 || V "^" _ m .o.
                      "(ku)" -> k u || FLAGS * "^" _ m .o.
                      "(ku)" -> 0 || _ ;

# FlapVowelChanges
define FlapChange "(rr)" -> d ;

# Biyameni -> Biyami
define NasalConsChange e -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "+" .o.
                       n -> 0 || "^" "+" _       .o.
                       "+" -> 0;

# 'r' can change depending on its environment
define RAllophony "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "^" "(r)" .o.
                  "(r)" -> 0 || _ "^" FLAGS * "^" r       .o.
                  "(r)" -> 0 || l _ .o.
                  "(r)" -> r;

define VerbGrammar  VerbLexicon              .o.
                    DeletePrecedingVowel .o.
                    DeleteFollowingVowel .o.
                    DirPhonChanges       .o.
                    FlapChange           .o.
                    NasalConsChange      .o.
                    RAllophony .o.
                    Cleanup;

define NounGrammar NounLexicon .o.
                   FlapChange           .o.
                   NasalConsChange      .o.
                   RAllophony .o.
                   Cleanup;

define AdjAdvGrammar AdjAdvLexicon .o.
                     FlapChange           .o.
                     NasalConsChange      .o.
                     RAllophony .o.
                     Cleanup;


regex FuncLexicon | AdjAdvGrammar | NounGrammar | VerbGrammar ;
